Illinois, session 104th, HB4981.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1119 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1119 new)8    Sec. 605-1119. Supporting small business creation.9    (a) Small businesses are the lifeblood of Illinois' 10economy, especially since the COVID-19 pandemic. Many of the 11businesses created in Illinois since 2020 have fewer than 20 12employees. Those businesses have created more than 172,000 13jobs. However, various State and local laws impose 14requirements on new businesses that can create difficulties 15for those businesses. This is particularly true for businesses 16with little to no capital or those located in areas with 17limited legal resources. In Illinois, new small businesses are 18often required to register or provide information to multiple 19State agencies, including, but not limited to, the Secretary 20of State, the Department of Revenue, the Department of 21Employment Security, the Department of Labor, the Department 22of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Environmental 23Protection Agency, and the Department of Financial and   HB4981- 2 -LRB104 19708 HLH 33157 b1Professional Regulation. Additionally, counties and some 2municipalities have established their own regulatory 3requirements. Each registration requires an additional fee. 4Navigating these registration requirements often requires 5legal assistance. It is the intent of the General Assembly to 6ensure that small businesses have an opportunity to thrive and 7help grow the State's economy without the burden of 8overregulation. 9    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall 10establish an office within the Department to serve as a single 11point of contact for the purpose of guiding businesses through 12the various registrations required by Illinois law and any 13unit of local government. This includes, but is not limited 14to, registrations required by the Secretary of State, the 15Department of Revenue, the Department of Labor, the Department 16of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Environmental 17Protection Agency, and the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation. 19    (c) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 20shall prepare a report on the various registration or 21licensing requirements for small business and provide the 22report to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 2331, 2026.  24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.